Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7484.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 6.3
BUILDINGS CARBON EMISSIONS REDUCTION ACT
42-6.3-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Buildings Carbon Emissions
Reduction Act".
42-6.3-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Building energy needs" means all energy uses including, but not limited to, space
conditioning, heating and cooling, water heating of pools and spas, cooking appliances and clothes
drying appliances.
(2) "Carbon impact report(s)" means a report, prepared by an independent firm of building
professionals, which may include, but not be limited to, licensed architects or engineers for the
purpose of reviewing the proposed energy uses at the proposed development, and a determination
as to whether the development will meet its building energy needs with one hundred percent (100%)
clean energy usage by the year 2050. For the purposes of this analysis, electricity may be presumed
to be one hundred percent (100%) renewable energy by 2050.

(3) "Large development(s)" means a proposed development that will be constructed on a
parcel of land that is greater than fifty thousand square feet (50,000 ft2) in size, and that proposes a
building or buildings that will individually or collectively contain more than fifty thousand square
feet (50,000 ft2) of gross building area.
42-6.3-3. Permits for large developments.
(a) No city or town shall issue a permit for the construction of any new large development,
if the initial application for such permit was submitted after December 31, 2026, unless the
circumstances set forth in subsection (b) or (c) of this section apply. For purposes of this subsection,
the initial application along with a carbon impact report shall be the first site or building permit
application, associated with the building or project.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a city or town may
issue a permit for construction of a large development upon a finding by the permitting body of
such city or town, that constructing a large development which is likely to meet its building energy
needs with one hundred percent (100%) clean energy usage by 2050 is physically or technically
unfeasible and that a modification is warranted. Financial considerations shall not be a sufficient
basis to determine physical or technical infeasibility. Modifications shall only be issued under this
exception where the permitting body finds that:
(1) Sufficient evidence was submitted to substantiate the infeasibility of an all-electric
building or project design. Such evidence shall show that the building is either:
(i) Unable to satisfy necessary building code requirements, without the usage of gas or oil
piping systems, fixtures and/or infrastructure; or
(ii) The building is specifically designated for occupancy by a commercial food service
establishment, and such establishment cannot feasibly operate using commercially available
electric appliances.
(2) The installation of natural gas or oil piping systems, fixtures and/or infrastructure is
strictly limited to the system and area of the building for which an all-electric building or project
design is infeasible.
(3) The area or service within the project where gas or oil piping systems, fixtures and/or
infrastructure are installed, is all-electric ready; and
(4) The project's modified design provides equivalent health, safety and fire protection to
an all-electric building or project design.
(c) Exemptions. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a city or
town may issue a permit for a large development, in which said building or group of buildings are
for the sole or primary use as a hospital, medical facility, laboratory for biological research or
LC003214 - Page 2 of 4

restaurant.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003214
========
LC003214 - Page 3 of 4